Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.45.060

Central Washington University—Yakima area.

Central Washington University is responsible for providing upper-division and graduate level higher education programs to the citizens of the Yakima area.

[ 2012 c 229 s 815; 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.